New York, session 2025-2026, S4449.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 41 of section 3602 of 2 the education law, as amended by section 10-d of part A of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 In addition to any other apportionment under this section, for the two 5 thousand seven--two thousand eight school year and thereafter, a school 6 district [other than a city school district in a city having a popu- 7 lation of one million or more] shall be eligible for an apportionment in 8 an amount equal to the greater of the sum of paragraphs (a), (b), and 9 (c), or paragraph (e) of this subdivision. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2027; provided, however, if 11 this act shall have become a law after such date it shall take effect 12 immediately and shall be deemed to have been in full force and effect on 13 and after April 1, 2027. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08951-02-6